Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Conduct of Election; Election Results.

§ 24.2-643.
Qualified voter permitted to vote; procedures at polling place; voter identification.

After the polls are open, each qualified voter at a precinct shall be permitted to vote. The officers of election shall ascertain that a person offering to vote is a qualified voter before admitting him to the voting booth and furnishing an official ballot to him.

An officer of election shall ask the voter for his full name and current residence address and the voter may give such information orally or in writing. The officer of election shall verify with the voter his full name and address and shall repeat, in a voice audible to party and candidate representatives present, the full name provided by the voter. The officer shall ask the voter to present any one of the following forms of identification: (i) his voter confirmation documents; (ii) his valid Virginia driver’s license, his valid United States passport, or any other identification issued by the Commonwealth, one of its political subdivisions, or the United States, other than a driver privilege card issued under §

46.2-328.3

or an identification privilege card issued under §

46.2-345.3

; (iii) any valid student identification card issued by any institution of higher education located in the Commonwealth or any private school located in the Commonwealth; (iv) any valid student identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by any institution of higher education located in any other state or territory of the United States; (v) any valid employee identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by an employer of the voter in the ordinary course of the employer’s business; or (vi) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document containing the name and address of the voter. The expiration date on a Virginia driver’s license shall not be considered when determining the validity of the driver’s license offered for purposes of this section.Except as provided in subsection E, any voter who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection shall be allowed to vote after signing a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be. A voter who requires assistance in voting by reason of a physical disability or an inability to read or write, and who requests assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

, may be assisted in preparation of this statement in accordance with that section. The provisions of §

24.2-649

regarding voters who are unable to sign shall be followed when assisting a voter in completing this statement. A voter who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection and does not sign this statement shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The State Board of Elections shall provide an ID-ONLY provisional ballot envelope that requires no follow-up action by the registrar or electoral board other than matching submitted identification documents from the voter for the electoral board to make a determination on whether to count the ballot.If the voter presents one of the forms of identification listed above, if his name is found on the pollbook in a form identical to or substantially similar to the name on the presented form of identification and the name provided by the voter, if he is qualified to vote in the election, and if no objection is made, an officer shall enter, opposite the voter’s name on the pollbook, the first or next consecutive number from the voter count form provided by the State Board, or shall enter that the voter has voted if the pollbook is in electronic form; an officer shall provide the voter with the official ballot; and another officer shall admit him to the voting booth. Each voter whose name has been marked on the pollbooks as present to vote and entitled to a ballot shall remain in the presence of the officers of election in the polling place until he has voted. If a line of voters who have been marked on the pollbooks as present to vote forms to await entry to the voting booths, the line shall not be permitted to extend outside of the room containing the voting booths and shall remain under observation by the officers of election.A voter may be accompanied into the voting booth by his child age 15 or younger.

If the current residence address provided by the voter is different from the address shown on the pollbook, the officer of election shall furnish the voter with a change of address form prescribed by the State Board. Upon its completion, the voter shall sign the prescribed form, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, which the officer of election shall then place in an envelope provided for such forms for transmission to the general registrar who shall then transfer or cancel the registration of such voter pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

24.2-400

et seq.).

At the time the voter is asked his full name and current residence address, the officer of election shall ask any voter for whom the pollbook indicates that an identification number other than a social security number is recorded on the Virginia voter registration system if he presently has a social security number. If the voter is able to provide his social security number, he shall be furnished with a voter registration form prescribed by the State Board to update his registration information. Upon its completion, the form shall be placed by the officer of election in an envelope provided for such forms for transmission to the general registrar. Any social security numbers so provided shall be entered by the general registrar in the voter’s record on the voter registration system.

This subsection shall apply in the case of any individual who is required by subparagraph (b) of 52 U.S.C. § 21083 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to show identification the first time he votes in a federal election in the state. At such election, such individual shall present (i) a current and valid photo identification or (ii) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter. Such individual who desires to vote in person but does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

. The identification requirements of subsection B of this section and subsection A of §

24.2-653

shall not apply to such voter at such election. The Department of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-653

and this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-244, 24-245, 24-248, 24-252, 24-308; 1952, c. 581; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 593; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-125, 24.1-126, 24.1-129, 24.1-218; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 247; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1982, c. 650, § 24.1-126.1; 1984, c. 234; 1985, cc. 197, 458; 1987, c. 349; 1993, c. 641; 1995, c. 716; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 1999, c. 725; 2000, cc. 366, 451; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, c. 410; 2005, cc. 496, 539; 2011, cc. 427, 458; 2012, cc. 723, 838, 839; 2013, cc. 725, 746; 2015, cc. 134, 571; 2016, c. 399; 2020, cc. 296, 1064, 1065, 1154, 1227, 1246; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 544.

Cross references.

As to application for absentee ballot, see §

24.2-701

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2004, c. 410, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act ( 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now
52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The amendment to this section by Acts
2012, c. 723, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated June 21, 2012.

The amendment to this section by Acts
2012, c. 839, was subject to preclearance by the United States Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was received by letter dated August 20, 2012. Acts
2012, c. 838 was deemed superseded by Acts
2012, c. 839 and was not submitted for preclearance.

Acts
2013, c. 703, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, provided an appropriation providing for a voter outreach or public information program and otherwise effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed during the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly that becomes law.” The appropriation was not made.

Acts
2013, c. 725, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided by Item 87 F of Acts
2013, c. 806.

The 2013 acts were subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. However, on June 25, 2013, the United States Supreme Court held invalid Section 4 of the Voting Rights Act that outlines the formula for determining what jurisdictions are covered under the section 5 preclearance processes. See
Shelby County v. Holder, — U.S. —, 133 S. Ct. 2612, 186 L. Ed. 2d 651, 2013 U.S. LEXIS 4917 (2013).

Acts
2013, c. 746, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

Acts
2015, c. 571, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 2, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1064 and
1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1227 and
1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1227 and
1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 544, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 544, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 1999 amendment

inserted “or as authorized by subsection E below” in the second sentence of subsection B and added subsection E.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 366 and 451 are identical, and in the section catchline, added “voter identification,” and in subsection B, rewrote the second sentence, which read: “The officer shall ask any voter, who is subject to the requirement to vote in person pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-416.1

, or as authorized by subsection E below, to present any one of the following forms of identification: his Commonwealth of Virginia voter registration card, his social security card, any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and address, any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and signature, or any preprinted form of identification which shows his name and photograph,” inserted “if he presents one of the forms of identification listed above” in the first paragraph, deleted “who is subject to the requirement to vote in person pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-416.1

” preceding “is entitled,” and deleted subsection E, which read: “The Board is authorized to conduct a pilot project requiring mandatory voter identification at the polling place, in up to ten jurisdictions, if agreed to by the jurisdiction’s local electoral board. Proper voter identification includes a Virginia voter identification card, social security card, or any preprinted form of identification with the voter’s name and address, preprinted form of identification with name and signature, or preprinted form of identification with name and photo. Additionally, if a voter is entitled to vote, except that he fails to present one of the forms of identification listed above, he shall be allowed to vote, by signing a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter he claims to be.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in subsection B, rewrote the second paragraph, which formerly read: “If the voter’s name is found on the registered voter list, if he presents one of the forms of identification listed above, if he is qualified to vote in the election, and if no objection is made, an officer shall mark the voter’s name on the registered voter list; an officer shall enter, opposite the voter’s preprinted name on the pollbook, the first or next consecutive number from the voter count form provided by the State Board; an officer shall provide the voter with the official ballot; and another officer shall admit him to the voting booth,” inserted the last two sentences at the end of the third paragraph, and substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the last paragraph; substituted “pollbook” for “registered voter list” in the first sentence of subsection C;
and rewrote subsection D, which formerly read: “At the time the voter is asked his full name and current residence address, the officer of election shall ask any voter for whom an identification number other than a social security number is recorded on the registered voter list if he presently has a social security number and note that number on the list if the voter is able to provide it. Any social security numbers so provided shall be entered by the general registrar in the voter’s record on the voter registration system.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, added “Except as provided in subsection E of this section” at the beginning of the first sentence in the third paragraph of subsection B; and added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 496 and 539 are identical, and added the next-to-last and last sentences in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 427 and 458 are identical, and in the second sentence in subsection E, inserted “government” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 723 inserted “his concealed handgun permit issued pursuant to §

18.2-308

” in the second sentence of subsection B, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 838 and 839 are nearly identical, and, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “any valid student identification card issued by any institution of higher education located in the Commonwealth of Virginia” and “or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, or paycheck that shows the name and address of the voter” and made related changes, added the second paragraph, and deleted the former third paragraph, which read: “Except as provided in subsection E of this section, if a voter is entitled to vote except that he is unable to present one of the forms of identification listed above, he shall be allowed to vote after signing a statement, subject to felony penalties for false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that he is the named registered voter who he claims to be. A voter who requires assistance in voting by reason of physical disability or inability to read or write, and who requests assistance pursuant to §

24.2-649

, may be assisted in preparation of this statement in accordance with that section. The provisions of §

24.2-649

regarding voters who are unable to sign shall be followed when assisting a voter in completing this statement.”; and made minor stylistic changes. Subsection B has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 725, effective July 1, 2014, in the second sentence of the first paragraph of subsection B, deleted “his Commonwealth of Virginia voter registration card, his social security card,” following “the following forms of identification,” substituted “his valid United States passport, or any other photo identification issued by the Commonwealth” for “his concealed handgun permit issued pursuant to §

18.2-308

, or any other identification card issued by a government agency of the Commonwealth,” inserted “containing a photograph of the voter and,” substituted “the Commonwealth; or any valid” for “the Commonwealth of Virginia; any valid,” and deleted “; or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, or paycheck that shows the name and address of the voter” following “employer’s business”; and deleted former subsection E. Subject to preclearance, see note.

The 2013 amendment by c. 746 substituted “§

18.2-308.04

” for “§

18.2-308

” in the second sentence of subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 134 substituted “If the voter presents” for “If the voter’s name is found on the pollbook, if he presents” and inserted “if his name is found on the pollbook in a form identical to or substantially similar to the name on the presented form of identification and the name stated by the voter” in the third paragraph in subsection B.

The 2015 amendment by c. 571, effective January 2, 2016, inserted “or any private school located in the Commonwealth” following “Commonwealth” in the second sentence of the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 399, in subsection B, inserted “the voter may give such information orally or in writing. The officer of election shall” in the first paragraph and substituted “provided by the voter” for “stated by the voter” in the first and third paragraphs; in subsection C, substituted “provided by the voter” for “stated by the voter.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 296, in subsection B, inserted “verify with the voter his full name and address and shall” and deleted “and address” preceding “provided by” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1064 and 1065 are identical, and in subsection B in the first paragraph, rewrote the third sentence, which read, “The officer shall ask the voter to present any one of the following forms of identification: his valid Virginia driver’s license, his valid United States passport, or any other photo identification issued by the Commonwealth, one of its political subdivisions, or the United States; any valid student identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by any institution of higher education located in the Commonwealth or any private school located in the Commonwealth; or any valid employee identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by an employer of the voter in the ordinary course of the employer’s business” and added the last sentence; and in the second paragraph, rewrote the first sentence, which read, “Any voter who does not show one of the forms of identification specified in this subsection shall be offered a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653

” and added subsection E.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1154, in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “(iii) any valid student identification card containing a photograph of the voter and issued by any institution of higher education located in any other state or territory of the United States” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “other than a driver privilege card issued under §

46.2-328.3

” in the third sentence in the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 544, effective January 1, 2022, inserted “or an identification privilege card issued under §

46.2-345.3

” in subsection B, second paragraph, clause (ii).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Valid.” —

State Board of Elections possesses regulatory authority to define the term “valid” as used in subsection B of
§

24.2-643

. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Mark D. Obenshain, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-056, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 70 (12/18/14).

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-644.
Voting by paper ballot; voting for presidential electors; write-in votes.

The qualified voter shall take the official paper ballot and enter the voting booth. After entering the voting booth, the qualified voter shall mark the ballot in accordance with the instructions for the type of ballot, for each candidate for whom he wishes to vote, leaving unmarked the name of each candidate for whom he does not wish to vote. Any ballot marked so that the intent of the voter is clear shall be counted.

The qualified voter at a presidential election shall mark the ballot in accordance with the instructions for the type of ballot, for his choice of candidates for President and Vice President. His ballot so marked shall be counted as if he had marked the ballot in accordance with the instructions for the type of ballot preceding the names of the individual electors affiliated with his choice for President and Vice President. The qualified voter at a presidential election may cast a write-in vote for President and Vice President as provided in subsections C and D.

At all elections except primary elections it is lawful for any voter to vote for any person other than the listed candidates for the office by writing or hand printing the person’s name on the official ballot. No check or other mark shall be required to cast a valid write-in vote. Write-in votes for President and Vice President shall be counted only for candidates who have filed a joint declaration of intent to be write-in candidates for the offices with the Commissioner of Elections not less than 10 days before the date of the presidential election. The declaration of intent shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board and shall include a list of presidential electors pledged to those candidates which equals the whole number of senators and representatives to which the Commonwealth at that time is entitled in the Congress of the United States. A write-in vote cast for candidates for President and Vice President, or for a candidate for President only, shall be counted for the individual electors listed on the declaration of intent as pledged to those candidates.

No write-in vote shall be counted unless the name is entered on the ballot in conformance with this section. No write-in vote shall be counted when it is apparent to the officers of election that a voter has voted for the same person for the same office more than one time. No write-in vote shall be counted for an office for any person whose name appears on the ballot as a candidate for that office. If two or more persons are to be elected to the same office, a voter may vote for one or more persons whose names do appear on the ballot and one or more persons whose names do not appear on the ballot, provided that the total number of votes cast by him for that office does not exceed the number of persons to be elected to that office.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-245, 24-252, 24-290.5, 24-307; 1952, c. 581; 1962, cc. 260, 536; 1964, c. 593; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-129, 24.1-161, 24.1-217; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1984, c. 234; 1985, cc. 197, 458; 1987, c. 349; 1990, c. 214; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 100; 2013, c. 542; 2018, c. 464.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Commissioner of Elections” for “Secretary of the State Board” in the third sentence in subsection C, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 464 rewrote the second sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “After entering the voting booth, the qualified voter shall mark immediately preceding the name of each candidate for whom he wishes to vote a check ([checkmark]) or a cross (X or +) or a line (-) in the square provided for such purpose, leaving unmarked the square preceding the name of each candidate for whom he does not wish to vote”; in subsection B, substituted “the ballot in accordance with the instructions for the type of ballot” for “the square preceding the names and party designation” in the first sentence and for “squares” in the second sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “it is lawful” for “it shall be” in the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 50, 53.

§ 24.2-645.
Defaced printed ballots.

If any printed ballot is unintentionally or accidentally defaced and rendered unfit for voting, the voter may deliver the defaced ballot to the officer of election and receive another. The returned ballot shall be marked spoiled by the officer of election and placed in the spoiled ballot envelope.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-238; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-130; 1987, c. 349; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “printed” for “paper.”

§ 24.2-646.
Voter folds paper ballot and hands same to officer who deposits it unopened in ballot container.

The qualified voter shall fold each paper ballot with the names of the candidates and questions on the inside and hand the folded ballot to the appropriate officer of election. The officer shall place the ballot in the ballot container without any inspection except to assure himself that only a single ballot has been tendered and that the ballot is a genuine ballot. Without looking at the printed inside of the ballot, the officer may inspect the official seal on the back of the ballot to determine if it is genuine.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-247; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-131; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” throughout the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and inserted “paper.”

§ 24.2-646.1.
Permitted use of paper ballots.

The official paper ballot shall be used by a voter to cast his vote only in one of the following circumstances:

The official paper ballot is the only ballot in use in the precinct.

The official paper ballot is used by voters voting outside of the polling place pursuant to §

24.2-649.1

.

The voter is casting a provisional ballot.

The voter is provided an official paper ballot or copy thereof pursuant to §

24.2-642

when voting equipment is inoperable or otherwise unavailable.

The official absentee paper ballot voted in accordance with (§

24.2-700

et seq.).

The voter is provided an official paper ballot for a presidential election pursuant to §

24.2-402

or for federal elections pursuant to §

24.2-453

.

History.

2006, c. 492; 2015, c. 313; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 163.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 313 added “or for federal elections pursuant to §

24.2-453

” at the end of subdivision 6.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 163, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “outside of the polling place” for “outside the polling place” and “§

24.2-649.1

” for “§

24.2-649

” in subdivision 2.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-647.
Voting systems; demonstration on election day.

The general registrar shall provide at each polling place on election day, for the voting system in use, a model of or materials displaying a portion of its ballot face. The model or materials shall be located on the table of one of the officers or in some other place accessible to the voters. An officer of election shall instruct any voter who requests instruction before voting on the proper manner of voting. The officer may direct the voter’s attention to sample ballots so that the voter may become familiar with the location of questions and names of offices and candidates.

For ballot scanner machines, an officer of election, using a demonstration ballot and machine, shall show each voter who requests, immediately on entry to the polling place, the manner in which the ballot is to be voted.

If any voter, after entering the voting booth, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, two of the officers from different political parties shall give such instructions to him, but no officer shall in any manner request or seek to persuade or induce any such voter to vote for or against any particular ticket, candidate, or question. After giving such instructions and before the voter votes, the officers shall leave the voting booth, and the voter shall cast his ballot in secret.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-309; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-219; 1980, c. 639; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first paragraph, substituted “system” for “device”; in the second paragraph substituted “ballot scanner machines” for “equipment using ballots inserted in electronic counting devices” and “machine” for “equipment”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the first sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Direct recording electronic machines. —

Local electoral boards are prohibited by §

24.2-626

from purchasing, borrowing, or leasing direct recording electronic machines for use at polling places on election day to demonstrate to voters how to operate the equipment pursuant to this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. G. William Thomas, Jr., Chairman, Electoral Board for the City of Richmond, 08-030 (6/16/08).

§ 24.2-648.
Write-in votes on voting equipment.

Write-in votes may be cast on voting equipment for any person whose name does not appear on the ballot as a candidate for the office being voted, subject to this section and the provisions of §

24.2-644

not in conflict with this section.

Each write-in vote shall be entered in the receptacle or area designated on the machine for the office being elected. A write-in vote shall be cast in its appropriate place, in accordance with the instructions for that equipment, or it shall be void and not counted.

Except on machines that provide a means to enter a name electronically, each write-in vote shall be entered by the voter in his own handwriting or hand printing.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-307; 1962, c. 260; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-217; 1975, c. 515; 1985, c. 458; 1990, c. 214; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 5; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the second paragraph, substituted “machine” for “device”; and in the third paragraph substituted “machines that” for “devices which.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 50, 53.